src/pronoun-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON indefdeclpluneven-n
 +Pl+Nom:at K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpluneven-obl
 +Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON indefattr
 +Attr:0 K ;


! Multiword indefinites
! - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indefmulti !SUB added this lexicon, because otherwise these would be in indefattr
 feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:feara% mij K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:feara% májd9 K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 feara% gii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:feara% gij K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 feara% mii+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:feara% ma oblintercas ; ! spellera dihte
 feara% gii+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:feara% gea oblintercas ; ! spellera dihte

 vaikko% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:vaikko% mij K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% mii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:vaikko% májd9 K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% gii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:vaikko% gij K-son ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% mii+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vaikko% ma oblintercas ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% gii+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vaikko% gea oblintercas ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% makkár+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:vaikko% makkár DAKKAR ;  ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% guh0te+Pron+Interr+Use/Sub:vaikko% guh'te GUHTECASE ;  ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% guhtemuš+Pron+Interr+Use/Sub:vaikko% guđemužž GUHTEMUŠCASE ; ! spellera dihte
 vaikko% goabbá+Pron+Interr+Use/Sub:vaikko% goabbá GUHTECASE ; ! spellera dihte

! some multiword prons, according to Nickel
!feara% mii iind ;
!feara% gii iind ;
 mii% nu+Use/Sub:mii% nu iind;  ! spellera
 gii% nu+Use/Sub:gii% nu iind;  ! spellera
 makkár% nu+Use/Sub:makkár% nu iind;  ! spellera
 makkáraš% nu+Use/Sub:makkáraš% nu iind;  ! spellera


! The indeclineable indefinites
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indeclindef
 ald+Use/Sub:ald9 iind ; !
buot iind ;
buot:buot»# NAMAT ;
gait:gajt iind ;
gait:gajt»# NAMAT ;
eatnat iind ;
eatnat:eatnat»# NAMAT ;
!fal iind ; ! cf. Nickel s. 126.
gallát iind ;
goabbat iind ;
goabbat:goabbat»# NAMAT ;
goappaš iind ;
goappaš:goappaš»# NAMAT ;
!goappašat iind ; ! thus both Nom and non-Nom. XXX.
guhtet iind ;
ieš#guhtet iind ;
ieš#guđet iind ;
ieš#guđet:ieš#guđet»# NAMAT ;
ieš#guhtet:ieš#guhtet»# NAMAT ;
ihkinassii iind ;
juohke iind ;
juohke:juohke»# NAMAT ;
ollu iind ;
olu iind ;
!vaikko iind ; !This is CS, not pron


LEXICON iind
 +Pron+Indef:%>0 K ;



! Separate lexica for exceptional entries
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON declindef-idiosync
! separate lexica for these entries:
! oktat
oktahat:ovttaha OVTTAHAT ;
 seammahat+Use/Sub:seammaha OVTTAHAT ; !
 seammahat+Pron+Indef+Attr+Use/Sub:seammahat # ; !
 seammahat+Pron+Indef+Nom+Sg+Use/Sub:seammahat # ; !
oktahat+Pron+Indef+Attr:oktahat%> K ;
aktahat+Pron+Indef+Attr:aktahat%> K ;
oktahat+Pron+Indef+Nom+Sg:oktahat%> K ;
aktahat+Pron+Indef+Nom+Sg:aktahat%> K ;

earrás+Pron+Indef:earrás EARRAS ;
ieš#guhtet+Pron+Indef+Nom:ieš#guhtet%> K ;
 ieš#guhtet+Pron+Indef+Gen+Use/Sub:ieš#guđet%> K ; !
 ieš#guhtet+Pron+Indef+Gen+Use/Sub:ieš#guđet»# NAMAT ; !
 ieš#guhtet+Pron+Indef+Acc+Use/Sub:ieš#guđet%> K ; !
 simme+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:simme SIMME ; !
 seamma+Pron+Indef+Use/Sub:seamma SEAMMA ; !
seammá+Pron+Indef:seammá SEAMMA ;
seamma+Pron+Indef+Attr:seamma»# NAMAT ;
seamma+Pron+Indef+Attr:seamma%> K ;
 seammá+Pron+Indef+Attr+Use/Sub:seammá # ; !, dict says seamma ~ seammá (#seamma)
juoga+Pron+Indef:juo JUOGA ;
 gal0le+Pron+Indef+Use/CircN:gal'l GUOKTE ; !
guktot+Pron+Indef:gukto indefdeclplcontr ;
juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:juogamij%> K-son ;
 juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:juogamájd9 K-son ; !
juogamii+Pron+Indef:juogama%> oblintercas ;

! okta
! juoga mii
!oktahat         +       no      OKTAHAT => indefeven / Nom=aktahat / OKTAttr
!        OKTattr:n=oktahat, aktahat, oktat, aktat
!                o=ovttahat, ovttat
!hárvvis        +       a       indef-a-      uneven  hárve, hárvves
!hárvvis        +       a       indef-a-      contr   hárve, hárvves
!Some problematic ones, one form for nsg, one for the rest
!oktat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:oktat%> K ;
!oktat+Pron+Indef:ovttat%> K ;
!oktahat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom:oktahat%> K ;
!oktahat+Pron+Indef+:ovttahat%> K ;

LEXICON indefdeclplcontr ! so far guktot
 +Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>jd9»# NAMAT ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%>jn K ;

LEXICON EARRAS
 +Sg+Acc:%>a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>a K ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>ij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>is K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:%>iin K ;
 +Ess:%>in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ijd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;


LEXICON SEAMMA
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:»# NAMAT ; !
 +Sg+Ill:%>j K ;  ! Let's await the verdict of the jury..
! +Sg+Loc:%>s K ; ! Let's settle for the Adv reading
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>n K ;  ! !SOUTH, well..., probably this one should Adv as well
 +Sg+Com:%>jn K ; ! Let's await the verdict of the jury..
 +Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>jd9»# NAMAT ; !

LEXICON SIMME !SUB
 +Sg+Nom:%> K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%> K ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>n K ;
 +Sg+Com:%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>t K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>jd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>jd9»# NAMAT ;



LEXICON JUOGA
 +Sg+Nom:ga%> K ;
 +Sg+Acc:ga%> K ;
 +Sg+Acc:jdá%> K ;
 +Pl+Acc:jdá%>jd9 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:jddá K ; !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:jaaájd9 K ; !
 +Sg+Gen:ga%> K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ga»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Ill:sa%>t K ;
 +Sg+Loc:stá%> K ;
 +Sg+Com:jdá%>jn K ;
 +Ess:jdá%>n K ;
 +Ess:ni%>n K ;
 +Attr+Use/Sub:da K ; !
 
LEXICON OVTTAHAT
 +Sg+Acc:g%>a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:g%>a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:t»# NAMAT ;
 +Sg+Ill:hk%>ii K ;
 +Sg+Loc:g%>as K ;
 +Sg+Com:g%>ajn K ;
 +Ess:hk%>an K ;
 +Pl+Nom:g%>at K ;
 +Pl+Acc:g%>ajd9 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:g%>ajd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:g%>ajde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:g%>ajn K ;
 +Pl+Com:g%>ajgujn K ;

LEXICON declindef
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>          indefattr ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>X2      indefdeclpluneven-n ;
soa0mes+Pron+Indef:soapmás%>i          indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
eanebut+Pron+Indef:eaneb%>u       indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
eanemusat+Pron+Indef:eanemus%>X2       indefdeclpluneven-n ;
eanemusat+Pron+Indef:eanemus%>iX2       indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
eanebat+Pron+Indef:eaneb%>i       indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
